Alaska, session 34, HB368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 16.05.300 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 16.05.300. Board meetings. (a) Subject to (b) of this section, each 06 [EACH] board shall hold at least one meeting a year and as many other meetings as it 07 considers necessary. Each board shall select the time and place in the state for the 08 transaction of business. Each board shall maintain its office at the principal office of 09 the department. 10 (b) The [IN ADDITION, THE] Board of Fisheries shall hold at least one 11 meeting or hearing a year in a community of fewer than 7,000 persons located off 12 the interconnected state road system. The board shall also hold at least one 13 meeting or hearing a year, which may include the meeting or hearing required in 14 a community of fewer than 7,000 persons located off the interconnected state 01 road system, in each of the following general areas: 02 (1) Upper Yukon - Kuskokwim - Arctic 03 (2) Western Alaska [(INCLUDING KODIAK)] 04 (3) Southcentral 05 (4) Prince William Sound (including Kodiak [YAKUTAT]) 06 (5) Southeast (including Yakutat). 07 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.